New York, session 2025-2026, S9242.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the office 2 of children and family services shall conduct a statewide needs assess- 3 ment to identify any unmet needs, including, but not limited to, hous- 4 ing, mental health access, financial assistance, childcare, and respite 5 care access for kinship caregivers. Such office shall further determine 6 if needs are being met throughout the state; suggest necessary improve- 7 ment areas and why certain areas need such improvement. 8 2. Upon request, every state and local agency shall cooperate with the 9 office of children and family services. For the accomplishment of its 10 purposes, the council may meet and hold public and/or private hearings 11 within or without the state, and shall have all the powers of a legisla- 12 tive committee pursuant to the legislative law. The council is author- 13 ized and empowered to undertake any studies, inquiries, surveys or 14 analyses it may deem relevant through its own personnel or in cooper- 15 ation with or by agreement with any other public or private agency. 16 § 2. The office of children and family services shall publish a report 17 containing the findings of such needs assessment and methods for 18 improvement. Such report shall be delivered to the governor, the tempo- 19 rary president of the senate, and the speaker of the assembly no later 20 than two years after the effective date of this act. 21 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 22 deemed repealed two years after such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14539-02-6